Indiana, session 2026, HB1061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-1-9.5-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.85-2021,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), if
a veterinarian is required to establish a veterinarian-client-patient
relationship to perform a health care service, the veterinarian shall
ensure that a proper an initial in-person examination of the patient
was conducted to establish the veterinarian-client-patient
relationship, is established, as defined in IC 25-38.1-1-14.5, when
providing the service using telehealth.
(b) If a veterinarian-client-patient relationship was established
on or before June 30, 2026, a veterinarian may continue to provide
health care services to the patient using telehealth without needing
to perform an in-person examination.
2026 IN 1061—LS 6131/DI 148